Connecticut, session 2026, HB05502.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 8-2s of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes,
as amended by section 16 of public act 25-1 of the November special
session, is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) On and after [July 1, 2026] January 1, 2027, any zoning regulations
adopted or amended pursuant to section 8-2 [(1)] or any special act shall
allow for the development of a transit community middle housing
development, as defined in section 8-13hh, or a mixed-use development,
on any lot that (1) is zoned for commercial or mixed-use development;
[, subject only to summary review, as defined in section 8-2r, and] (2) is
zoned for industrial use, provided such lot is not greater than one
thousand feet from (A) a transit station, as defined in section 8-169hh,
sHB5502 / File No. 274 1

sHB5502 File No. 274
or (B) a highway, as defined in section 13a-123c; or (3) was previously
zoned for residential use at any time, subject only to summary review,
as defined in section 8-2r.
(b) On and after July 1, 2026, any zoning regulations adopted or
amended pursuant to section 8-2 or any special act may allow for the
development of a transit community middle housing development on
any lot that allows for residential use, subject only to such summary
review.
[(b)] (c) Any municipality that adopts zoning regulations that allow
for the development of a transit community middle housing
development [as described in subdivision (2) of] pursuant to subsection
[(a)] (b) of this section shall be awarded one-quarter housing unit-
equivalent point pursuant to subdivision (6) of subsection (l) of section
8-30g, as amended by this act, for each unit of such middle housing for
which a certificate of occupancy has been issued by the municipality.
[(c)] (d) No municipality that has (1) adopted zoning regulations that
allow for the development of a transit community middle housing
development [as described in subdivision (2) of] pursuant to subsection
[(a)] (b) of this section, (2) been awarded housing unit-equivalent points
pursuant to subsection [(b)] (c) of this section, and (3) qualified for a
moratorium from the affordable housing appeals procedure under
subsection (l) of section 8-30g, as amended by this act, based in part on
housing unit-equivalent points awarded pursuant to subsection [(b)] (c)
of this section shall repeal or substantially modify such zoning
regulations concerning such development of such middle housing
during the period of such moratorium.
Sec. 2. Subdivision (6) of subsection (l) of section 8-30g of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(6) For the purposes of this subsection, housing unit-equivalent
points shall be determined by the commissioner as follows: (A) No
points shall be awarded for a unit unless its occupancy is restricted to
sHB5502 / File No. 274 2

sHB5502 File No. 274
persons and families whose income is equal to or less than eighty per
cent of the median income, except that (i) unrestricted units in a set-
aside development shall be awarded one-quarter point each, and (ii)
dwelling units in transit community middle housing developments
developed pursuant to [subdivision (2) of] subsection [(a)] (b) of section
8-2s, as amended by this act, shall be awarded one-quarter point each;
(B) family units restricted to persons and families whose income is equal
to or less than eighty per cent of the median income shall be awarded
one point if an ownership unit and one and one-half points if a rental
unit; (C) family units restricted to persons and families whose income is
equal to or less than sixty per cent of the median income shall be
awarded one and one-half points if an ownership unit and two points if
a rental unit; (D) family units restricted to persons and families whose
income is equal to or less than forty per cent of the median income shall
be awarded two points if an ownership unit and two and one-half points
if a rental unit; (E) elderly units restricted to persons and families whose
income is equal to or less than eighty per cent of the median income shall
be awarded one-half point; (F) a set-aside development containing
family units which are rental units shall be awarded additional points
equal to twenty-two per cent of the total points awarded to such
development, provided the application for such development was filed
with the commission prior to July 6, 1995; (G) a mobile manufactured
home in a resident-owned mobile manufactured home park shall be
awarded points as follows: (i) One and one-half points when occupied
by persons and families with an income equal to or less than eighty per
cent of the median income, (ii) two points when occupied by persons
and families with an income equal to or less than sixty per cent of the
median income, and (iii) one-fourth point for the remaining units; and
(H) any unit described in subparagraphs (A) to (G), inclusive, of this
subdivision shall be awarded an additional one-quarter point, provided
such unit was constructed by or in conjunction with a housing authority,
as defined in section 8-40, of a neighboring municipality.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
sHB5502 / File No. 274 3

sHB5502 File No. 274
Section 1 July 1, 2026 8-2s
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 8-30g(l)(6)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
The title was changed; and in Section 2, the effective date was changed
from October 1, 2026 to July 1, 2026, for consistency.
PD Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5502 / File No. 274 4

sHB5502 File No. 274
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
All Municipalities Potential Minimal Minimal
Revenue
Loss
All Municipalities Potential Minimal Minimal
Savings
All Municipalities Potential See Below See Below
Grand List
Impact
Explanation
The bill pushes out a provision from July 1, 2026, to January 1, 2027,
that requires municipalities to allow certain developments to be built on
parcels zoned for commercial or mixed-use development subject only to
summary review. This moves out any impact associated this the
provision by six months.
The bill also extends these provisions to certain middle housing and
mixed-use developments. This results in a grand list impact that is
dependent on how the land would have otherwise been used.
This may also result in a potential savings and potential revenue loss
to municipalities beginning in FY 27 to the extent fewer public hearings
are held and fewer permit fees are collected as summary review does
not require a public hearing or special permits.
The Out Years
sHB5502 / File No. 274 5

sHB5502 File No. 274
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
sHB5502 / File No. 274 6

sHB5502 File No. 274
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5502
AN ACT CONCERNING HOUSING DEVELOPMENT ON CERTAIN
LOTS ZONED FOR INDUSTRIAL USE OR PREVIOUSLY ZONED
FOR RESIDENTIAL USE.